nb: Medisinsk identifikasjonstype: Ankelbånd; Armbånd; Brooch; Nøkkelring; Halskjede; Pin; Skotagg; Tagg; Lommebokkort; Klokke; Annet
zh-CN: 医疗识别类型: 脚环; 手环; 胸针; 钥匙链; 项链; 别针; 鞋标; 标签; 钱包卡; 手表; 其他
en: Medical identification type: Anklet; Bracelet; Brooch; Keychain; Necklace; Pin; Shoe tag; Tag; Wallet card; Watch; Other
ro-RO: Tipul de identificare medicală: Brățară pentru gleznă; Brățară; Broșă; Breloc; Colier; Ecuson; Etichetă pentru pantofi; Etichetă; Card de portofel; Ceas; Altele
da: Medicinsk identifikationstype: Ankelring; Armbånd; Broche; Nøglering; Halskæde; Stift; Skotag; Tag; Tegnebogskort; Ur; Andet
de: Medizinischer Identifikationstyp: Fußkettchen; Armband; Brosche; Keychain; Halskette; Nadel; Schuhetikett; Tag; Brieftaschenkarte; Uhr; Sonstiges
es: Tipo de identificación médica: Tobillo; Pulsera; Broche; Llavero; Collar; Pasador; Etiqueta de calzado; Etiqueta; Tarjeta de cartera; Reloj; Otros
tr: Tıbbi tanımlama tipi: Halhal; Bileklik; Broş; Anahtarlık; Kolye; Toplu iğne; Ayakkabı etiketi; Etiket; Cüzdan kartı; Saat; Diğer
bg-BG: Тип медицинска идентификация: Гривна за глезен; Гривна; Брошка; Ключодържател; Огърлица; Пин; Табелка за обувки; Етикет; Портфейлна карта; Часовник; Други
cs: Typ lékařské identifikace: Řetízek na kotník; Náramek; Brož; Klíčenka; Náhrdelník; Kolík; Štítek na boty; Štítek; Karta do peněženky; Hodinky; Jiné
pl: Rodzaj identyfikatora medycznego: Bransoletka na kostkę; Bransoletka; Broszka; Brelok do kluczy; Naszyjnik; Szpilka; Przypinka do buta; Metka; Karta identyfikacyjna; Zegarek; Inne
ko: 의료용 인식표 유형: Anklet; 팔찌; 브로치; 열쇠고리; 목걸이; 핀; 신발 태그; 태그; 월렛 카드; 시계; 기타
hr-HR: Vrsta medicinske identifikacije: Za gležanj; Narukvica; Broš; Privjesak; Ogrlica; Pribadača; Privjesak za cipele; Pločica; Kartica; Sat; Ostalo
fr: Type d’identification médicale: Bracelet de cheville; Bracelet; Broche; Porte-clés; Collier; Épingle; Étiquette de chaussure; Étiquette; Carte de portefeuille; Montre; Autre
it: Tipo di identificazione medica: Cavigliera; Braccialetto; Spilla; Keychain; Collana; Spillo; Etichetta della scarpa; Tag; Carta portafoglio; Orologio; Altro
el: Τύπος ιατρικής ταυτότητας: Βραχιόλι αστραγάλου; Βραχιόλι; Καρφίτσα; Μπρελόκ; Κολιέ; Καρφίτσα; Ταμπέλα παπουτσιού; Ταμπέλα; Κάρτα πορτοφολιού; Ρολόι; Άλλο
lt-LT: Medicininio identifikavimo tipas: Apykojė; Apyrankė; Sagė; Raktų pakabukas; Grandinėlė; Smeigtukas; Batų žyma; Žyma; Piniginės kortelė; Laikrodis; Kita
vi: Loại nhận dạng y tế: Anklet; Vòng đeo tay; Trâm; Móc chìa khóa; Vòng cổ; Ghim; Tag giày; Tag; Ví đựng card; Đồng hồ; Khác
fi: Lääketieteellinen tunnistustyyppi: Nilkkaremmi; Ranneke; Rintaneula; Avaimenperä; Kaulakoru; Tappi; Kengän tunniste; Tunniste; Lompakkokortti; Kello; Muu
pt-PT: Tipo de identificação médica: Tornozeleira; Pulseira; Broche; Chaveiro; Colar; Alfinete; Etiqueta de sapato; Etiqueta; Carteira para cartões; Relógio; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta medicinske identifikacije: Zapestnica za gleženj; Zapestnica; Broška; Obesek za ključe; Ogrlica; Značka; Oznaka za čevlje; Oznaka; Vizitka; Ura; Drugo
ru: Тип медицинской идентификации: Ножной браслет; Браслет; Брошь; Брелок; Ожерелье; Значок; Бирка для обуви; Бирка; Карточка для кошелька; Часы; Другое
sk-SK: Typ lekárskej identifikácie: Náramok na členok; Náramok; Brošňa; Kľúčenka; Náhrdelník; Špendlík; Štítok na topánky; Štítok; Karta do peňaženky; Hodinky; Iné
zh-TW: 病患身分證件類型: 腳鍊; 手鏈; 胸針; 鑰匙鏈; 項鍊; 別針; 鞋標籤; 標籤; 錢包卡; 手錶; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de identificação médica: Tornozeleira; Pulseira; Broche; Chaveiro; Colar; Alfinete; Etiqueta de sapato; Etiqueta; Cartão pré-pago; Relógio; Outro
th: ประเภทการระบุข้อมูลสุขภาพ: กำไลเท้า; สร้อยข้อมือ; เข็มกลัด; พวงกุญแจ; สร้อยคอ; เหรียญตรา; แท็กรองเท้า; แถบป้าย; บัตรกระเป๋าสตางค์; นาฬิกา; อื่นๆ
ja: 医療識別タイプ: アンクレット; ブレスレット; ブローチ; キーチェーン; ネックレス; ピン; シュータグ; タグ; ウォレットカード; 腕時計; その他
nl: Type medische identificatie: Enkelbandje; Armband; Broche; Sleutelhanger; Halsketting; Pin; Schoenlabel; Label; Portemonnee kaart; Horloge; Andere
hu: Egészségügyi azonosító típusa: Bokalánc; Karkötő; Bross; Kulcstartó; Nyaklánc; Tű; Cipőcímke; Címke; Feltöltőkártya; Óra; Egyéb
sv: Typ av medicinsk identifiering: Anklet; Armband; Brosch; Nyckelring; Halsband; Stift; Skomärke; Tag; Plånbokskort; Klocka; Övrigt